Hawaii statutes.
§26-15 Department of land and natural
resources. (a) The department of land and natural resources shall be
headed by an executive board to be known as the board of land and natural
resources, except for matters relating to the state water code where the
commission on water resource management shall have exclusive jurisdiction and
final authority.

The board shall consist of seven members, one
from each land district and three at large. The appointment, tenure, and
removal of the members and the filling of vacancies on the board shall be as
provided in section 26-34. At least one member of the board shall have a
background in conservation and natural resources, as provided in section
171-4. At least one member, other than the member with a background in
conservation and natural resources, shall have demonstrated expertise in native
Hawaiian traditional and customary practices, as provided in section 171-4, to
ensure assistance to the board to better administer the public lands and
resources with respect to native Hawaiian issues and concerns, the public land
trust obligations, and the recognition of native Hawaiian cultural values that
are intrinsically tied to the ‘aina.

The governor shall appoint the chairperson of
the board from among the members thereof.

The board may delegate to the chairperson such
duties, powers, and authority, or so much thereof, as may be lawful or proper
for the performance of the functions vested in the board.

The chairperson of the board shall serve in a
full-time capacity. The chairperson, in that capacity, shall perform those
duties, and exercise those powers and authority, or so much thereof, as may be
delegated by the board.

(b) The department shall manage and administer
the public lands of the State and minerals thereon and all water and coastal
areas of the State except the commercial harbor areas of the State, including
the soil conservation function, the forests and forest reserves, aquatic life,
wildlife resources, state parks, including historic sites, and all activities
thereon and therein including, but not limited to, boating, ocean recreation,
and coastal areas programs.

(c) The functions and authority heretofore
exercised by the commissioner and board of public lands (including the
hydrography division and the bureau of conveyances), the Hawaii water
authority, the commission on ground water resources, the Hawaii land
development authority, the soil conservation committee, and the commission on
historical sites and the function of managing the state parks and the function
of promoting the conservation, development and utilization of forests,
including the regulatory powers over the forest reserve, aquatic life and
wildlife resources of the State heretofore exercised by the board of
commissioners of agriculture and forestry as heretofore constituted are
transferred to the department of land and natural resources established by this
chapter. [L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §21; am L 1961, c 132, §1(b) to (e); am L 1963, c
10, §1; am L 1965, c 223, §8(b); Supp, §14A-20; am L 1967, c 145, §1; HRS
§26-15; am L 1983, c 15, §1; am L 1987, c 45, §3; am L 1991, c 272, §3; am L
1999, c 6, §1; am L 2002, c 16, §3; am L 2005, c 9, §1; am L 2014, c 104, §1]

Note

The 2014 amendment applies to the board of land and natural
resources upon its next vacancy. L 2014, c 104, §4.

Two-year water security advisory group pilot program to
enable public-private partnerships that increase water security; annual report
to governor and 2017-2018 legislature (repealed June 30, 2018). L 2016, c 172.

Water rights lease applications; annual reports to 2017-2020
legislature. L 2016, c 126, §2.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next